en: Crottin de Chavignol cheese, Crottin de Chavignol cheese from goat's milk
xx: Crottin de Chavignol
fr: Crottin de Chavignol, Crottin de Chavignol fromage de chèvre
he: קרוטן דה שביניול
ja: クロタン・ドゥ・シャヴィニョール
ru: Кротен-де-Шавиньоль
uk: Кротен-де-Шавіньоль
zh: 沙维尼奥勒圆形山羊奶酪

en: Picodon, Picodon cheese from goat's milk
xx: Picodon
fr: Picodon, Picodon fromage de chèvre
hy: Պիկոդոն
ru: Пикодон
zh: 比考頓芝士

en: Sainte Maure cheese, Sainte Maure cheese from goat's milk
fr: Sainte-Maure fromage de chèvre, fromage chèvre Sainte Maure
hr: sir sainte maure
it: formaggio Sainte Maure

en: Sainte-Maure de Touraine
xx: Sainte-Maure de Touraine
he: סנט מור
ru: Сент-Мор-де-Турен
uk: Сент-Мор-де-Турен

en: rocamadour, Rocamadour cheese, Rocamadour cheese from goat's milk
xx: rocamadour
fr: Rocamadour fromage de chèvre, fromage Rocamadour
he: רוקמדור
hy: Ռոկամադուր
oc: Ròcamador
ru: Рокамадур
uk: Рокамадур

en: sheep's-milk cheese, Sheep Cheeses, Cheeses from sheep milk
bg: овче сирене
ca: formatge de llet d'ovella, formatges d'ovella, formatges de llet d'ovella, formatge d'ovella
cs: ovčí sýr
de: Schafskäse, Schafkäse, Schafmilchkäse, Käse aus Schafsmilch
el: πρόβειο τυρί
es: queso de leche de oveja, Quesos de oveja, Quesos de leche de oveja, queso de oveja
fa: پنیر شیر گوسفند
fi: lampaanjuusto, lampaanmaitojuusto, juusto lampaanmaidosta
fr: Fromages de brebis, fromage de brebis, fromage au lait de brebis, Fromages au lait de brebis
he: גבינת כבשים
hr: sir od ovčjeg mlijeka
hu: juhsajt
hy: ոչխարի պանիր
it: formaggio di pecore, Formaggio di pecora
ko: 양젖 치즈
nl: schapenkaas, Schapenkazen
nn: ost av sauemjølk
pl: ser z mleka owczego, ser owczy, owczy ser
ro: brânză din lapte de oaie
ru: сыр из овечьего молока
sr: овчији сир
sv: Fårost
zh: 羊奶酪

fr: fromage de brebis au lait pasteurisé
ca: formatge de llet d'ovella pasteuritzada
es: queso de leche de oveja pasteurizada

en: soft white cheese
ca: formatge blanc suau
da: friskost
de: Frischkäse
es: Queso blanco blando
fi: tuorejuusto, salaattijuusto
fr: fromage frais
hr: svježi sir, svježi sirevi, meki bijeli sir
hu: fehér lágysajt
it: formaggio fresco
nb: ferskost
nl: Zachte witte kaas
sv: färskost

fr: fromage frais au lait demi-écrémé
ca: formatge fresc semidesnatat, formatge fresc parcialment desnatat
es: queso fresco semidesnatado, queso fresco parcialmente desnatado, queso blanco semidesnatado

fr: fromage frais au lait demi-écrémé pasteurisé, Fromage frais nature au lait demi-écrémé pasteurisé
ca: formatge fresc semidesnatat pasteuritzat, formatge fresc parcialment desnatat pasteuritzat
es: queso fresco semidesnatado pasteurizado, queso fresco parcialmente desnatado pasteurizada

fr: fromage frais à 0% de matière grasse
ca: formatge fresc amb un 0% matéria grassa
es: queso fresco con 0% matéria grasa

fr: fromage frais au lait pasteurisé
ca: formatge fresc pasteuritzat
es: queso fresco pasteurizado, queso blanco pasteurizado

en: skimmed soft white cheese
es: queso fresco desnatado
hr: obrani meki bijeli sir
it: formaggio bianco morbido scremato

en: melted cheese
bg: топено сирене
ca: formatge fos
de: Schmelzkäse
es: queso fundido, Queso derretido
fi: sulatejuusto
fr: fromage fondu
hu: ömlesztett sajt
it: formaggio fuso
nl: smeltkaas
sv: smältost

en: melted powdered cheese
it: formaggio in polvere fuso

en: melted grated cheese
ca: formatge fos ratllat
es: queso fundido rallado
hr: otopljeni ribani sir
it: formaggio grattugiato fuso

en: low fat cheese
bg: нискомаслено сирене
ca: formatge magre
de: fettarmer Käse
es: queso magro
fr: fromage maigre
hr: nemasni sir
it: formaggio magro
nl: vetarme kaas

fr: fromage au lait cru
ca: formatge de llet crua
es: queso de leche cruda

fr: fromage au lait pasteurisé
ca: formatge de llet pasteuritzada
es: queso de leche pasteurizada

en: cheese powder
da: ostepulver, ostpulver
it: formaggio in polvere
nb: ostepulver
sv: ostpulver